test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-cohhoom_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - čohhoom: # 1B g-v, hhoo-›ho
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Nom: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Gen: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Acc: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Ill: čohomân
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Loc: čohomist
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Com: čohomáin
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Abe: čohhoomttáá
    čohhoom+N+Ess: čohomin
    čohhoom+N+Par: čohomid
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Nom: čohomeh
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Gen: čohomij
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Acc: čohomijd
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Ill: čohomáid
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Loc: čohomijn
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Com: čohomijguin
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Abe: čohomijttáá
